District of Columbia statutes.
8-102.06

Public information and outreach campaigns.

Beginning on or before October 1, 2009, the District Department of the Environment shall:

(1)

Conduct an intensive public information campaign aimed at educating the public on the importance of reducing the number of disposable carryout bags entering the waste stream and the impact of disposable carryout bags on the rivers, tributaries, and environmental health of the District; and

(2)

Conduct an outreach campaign that includes:

(A)

A public-private partnership to provide reusable carryout bags to District residents; and

(B)

Working with service providers that assist seniors and low-income residents to distribute information and multiple reusable carryout bags to low-income households.

Sept. 23, 2009, D.C. Law 18-55, § 7, 56 DCR 5703